Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2307
Kindred of half blood.

The degrees of kindred shall be computed according to the rule of civil law. Relatives of the half blood inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 29, UPC § 2-107;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 3.